District of Columbia statutes.
47-2205

Payment of tax by purchaser.

If a purchaser has not reimbursed for the tax such vendors or retailers as are required or authorized to pay the tax, as the case may be, such purchaser shall file a return as hereinafter provided and pay to the Mayor a tax at the rates provided in § 47-2002 on the sales prices of property and services purchased at retail sale.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 127, ch. 146, title II, § 215
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 118, ch. 218, title XIII, § 1308
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 219, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2205.
1973 Ed., § 47-2705.